Washington statutes.
RCW 2.56.090

Disbursement of appropriated funds.

Any moneys appropriated for the purposes of this chapter shall be disbursed, upon order of the chief justice, on warrants drawn by the state auditor on the general fund.

[ 1957 c 259 s 9.]